apertium-myv-fin.myv.lexc
LEXICON TV_ЧАЧТОМС-ObjAll_sub
%<use_sub%>: TV_ЧАЧТОМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON TV_ЧАЧТОМС-ObjAll
%<v%>%<tv%>@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_ЧАЧТОМС ;

!LEXICON TV_ЯНГАВОМС-ObjAll
! %<v%>%<tv%>@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_ЯНГАВОМС ;

LEXICON TV_КУНДАМС-ObjAll_sub
%<use_sub%>: TV_КУНДАМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON TV_КУНДАМС-ObjAll
%<v%>%<tv%>@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_КУНДАМС ;

! This actually does exist in a pair verb
! таргатомс
LEXICON TV_САТОМС-ObjAll_sub
%<use_sub%>: TV_САТОМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON TV_САТОМС-ObjAll
%<v%>%<tv%>@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_САТОМС ;

! This should not exist by definition
! 
!LEXICON TV_ЛЕТЕМС-ObjAll
! %<v%>%<tv%>@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_ЛЕТЕМС ;

LEXICON TV_УЕМС-ObjAll_sub
%<use_sub%>: TV_УЕМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON TV_УЕМС-ObjAll
%<v%>%<tv%>@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_УЕМС ;

LEXICON TV_ТУЕМС-ObjAll_sub
%<use_sub%>: TV_ТУЕМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON TV_ТУЕМС-ObjAll
%<v%>%<tv%>@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ Indicative_Present_Obj ;
%<v%>%<tv%>@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_ТУЕМС ;

LEXICON TV_ТЕЕМС-ObjAll_sub
%<use_sub%>: TV_ТЕЕМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON TV_ТЕЕМС-ObjAll
%<v%>%<tv%>@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_ТЕЕМС ;

LEXICON TV_НЕЕМС-ObjAll_sub
%<use_sub%>: TV_НЕЕМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON TV_НЕЕМС-ObjAll
%<v%>%<tv%>@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_НЕЕМС ;

LEXICON TV_МИЕМС-ObjAll_sub
%<use_sub%>: TV_МИЕМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON TV_МИЕМС-ObjAll
%<v%>%<tv%>@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_МИЕМС ;

LEXICON TV_НЕКШНЕМС-ObjAll_sub
%<use_sub%>: TV_НЕКШНЕМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON TV_НЕКШНЕМС-ObjAll
%<v%>%<tv%>@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_НЕКШНЕМС ;

LEXICON TV_КУЗЕМС-ObjAll_sub
%<use_sub%>: TV_КУЗЕМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON TV_КУЗЕМС-ObjAll
%<v%>%<tv%>@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_КУЗЕМС ;

!! !!! VERBS WITH INTRANSITIVE TAGS %<v%>%<iv%>
LEXICON IV_УЕМС
%<v%>%<iv%>: V_УЕМС ;

LEXICON IV_ТУЕМС
%<v%>%<iv%>: V_ТУЕМС ;

LEXICON IV_ТЕЕМС
%<v%>%<iv%>: V_ТЕЕМС ;

LEXICON IV_НЕЕМС
%<v%>%<iv%>: V_НЕЕМС ;

LEXICON IV_МИЕМС
%<v%>%<iv%>: V_МИЕМС ;

LEXICON IV_НЕКШНЕМС_sub
%<use_sub%>: IV_НЕКШНЕМС ;

LEXICON IV_НЕКШНЕМС
%<v%>%<iv%>: V_НЕКШНЕМС ;

!касомс:ка
LEXICON IV_КАСОМС
%<v%>%<iv%>: V_КАСОМС ;

!куземс:ку
LEXICON IV_КУЗЕМС
%<v%>%<iv%>: V_КУЗЕМС ;

LEXICON IV_ЛЕДЕМС
%<v%>%<iv%>: V_ЛЕДЕМС ;

LEXICON IV_САВТОМС
%<v%>%<iv%>: V_САВТОМС ;
LEXICON IV_САВТОМС-SG3
%<v%>%<iv%>: V_САВТОМС-SG3 ;
LEXICON IV_САВТОМС-SG3_SUBJ/ZERO
%<v%>%<iv%>%<subj-zero%>: V_САВТОМС-SG3 ;

LEXICON IV_ЧАЧТОМС
%<v%>%<iv%>: V_ЧАЧТОМС ;

LEXICON IV_НЕВТЕМС
%<v%>%<iv%>: V_НЕВТЕМС ;

LEXICON IV_КАДОМС
%<v%>%<iv%>: V_КАДОМС ;

LEXICON IV_САЕВЕМС
%<v%>%<iv%>: V_САЕВЕМС ;

LEXICON IV_ЯНГАВОМС
%<v%>%<iv%>: V_ЯНГАВОМС ;

LEXICON IV_КУНДАМС
%<v%>%<iv%>: V_КУНДАМС ;

LEXICON IV_САТОМС
%<v%>%<iv%>: V_САТОМС ;

LEXICON IV_ЛЕТЕМС
 IV_САТОМС ;

!! !!!AUXILIARY VERBS
LEXICON VA_ЯНГАВОМС
%<v%>%<aux%>: V_ЯНГАВОМС ;

LEXICON VA_ЯНГАВОМС-SG3
%<v%>%<aux%>: V_ЯНГАВОМС-SG3 ;

LEXICON VA_ЛЕТЕМС
%<v%>%<aux%>: V_САТОМС ;

LEXICON VA_ЛЕТЕМС-SG3
%<v%>%<aux%>: V_САТОМС-SG3 ;

LEXICON VA_КУНДАМС
%<v%>%<aux%>: V_КУНДАМС ;


!! !!!VERBS AFTER TRANSITIVITY Tags OBJECT FLAGS 

LEXICON V_УЕМС
 :й V_КАДОМС ;

LEXICON V_ТУЕМС
                 :й V_КАДОМС ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;
 IND-PRS-40 ;
 IND-PRS-50 ;

LEXICON V_ТЕЕМС
!! теемс:тей
 V_КАДОМС ;

LEXICON V_НЕЕМС
                 :й V_КАДОМС ;
 @R.CONJ.ObjAll@  Indicative_Present_Obj-in-S ; ! 2012-08-07 неса
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;


LEXICON V_МИЕМС
                 :й V_КАДОМС ;
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@  Indicative_Present_Obj-in-S ; ! 2012-08-07 миса
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;


LEXICON V_НЕКШНЕМС_sub
%<use_sub%>: V_НЕКШНЕМС ;
LEXICON V_НЕКШНЕМС
:е V_КУНДАМС ;
:э V_КУНДАМС ;

!касомс:ка
LEXICON V_КАСОМС
:с V_КАДОМС ;
0@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:й@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;

!куземс:ку
LEXICON V_КУЗЕМС
:зь V_ЛЕДЕМС ;
0@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:й@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;


LEXICON V_ЛЕДЕМС
 V_КАДОМС ;

LEXICON V_САВТОМС
 V_КАДОМС ;

LEXICON V_САВТОМС-SG3
 V_КАДОМС-SG3 ;

LEXICON V_ЧАЧТОМС
 V_КАДОМС ;
0@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:а@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;

LEXICON V_НЕВТЕМС
 V_КАДОМС ;

LEXICON V_КАДОМС
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT1-all ;
00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>Ы2@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT2-all ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ Conjunctive-noArrow ;


  CondVerbs ;
 VerbsPresPrc_1 ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ V_КАДОМС-a ;
 Deverbals-kadoms ;

LEXICON V_КАДОМС-SG3
0@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT1-30 ;
00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>Ы2@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT2-30 ;
00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>%^О2@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ CNJ-30 ;
%<der_cond%>%<conj%>0000@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@:%>Ы2ндеря%>@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@ CNJ-30 ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@ IND-PRS-30 ;
%<conneg%>00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@:%>%^О2К3@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ _КУДО-Tenses1 ;
%<des%>0000@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.DES@:%>Ы2ксэ@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.DES@ DES-PRT2-30 ;
!! no deverbals

LEXICON V_САЕВЕМС
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT1-all ;
00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>Ы2@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT2-all ;
00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>WLoss@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ Conjunctive-noArrow ;
%<use_sub%>%<dial%>@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>%^О2@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ Conjunctive-noArrow ;

  CondVerbs ;
     VerbsPresPrc_1 ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ V_КАДОМС-a ;
  Deverbals-kadoms ;

LEXICON V_САЕВЕМС-SG3
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT1-30 ;
00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>Ы2@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT2-30 ;
00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>WLoss@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ CNJ-30 ;
%<use_sub%>%<dial%>@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>%^О2@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ CNJ-30 ;
%<der_cond%>%<conj%>0000@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@:%>Ы2ндеря%>@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@ CNJ-30 ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@ IND-PRS-30 ;
%<conneg%>00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@:%>%^О2К3@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ _КУДО-Tenses1 ;
%<des%>0000@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.DES@:%>Ы2ксэ@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.DES@ DES-PRT2-30 ;
!! no deverbals

LEXICON V_ЯНГАВОМС
 V_САЕВЕМС ;
LEXICON V_ЯНГАВОМС-SG3
 V_САЕВЕМС-SG3 ;

LEXICON V_КУНДАМС
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT1-all ;
00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>Ы2@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT2-all ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ Conjunctive-noArrow ;

  CondVerbs ;
     VerbsPresPrc_1 ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ V_КУНДАМС-a ;
  Deverbals-kundams ; !This denies linking vowel



LEXICON V_САТОМС
!2012-10-27! This still needs work
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT1-all-but-Sc3 ;
%<use_sub%>@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:0@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT1-Sc3 ;
000@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>%^О2т@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT1-Sc3 ;

00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>Ы2@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT2-all ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ Conjunctive-noArrow ;

  CondVerbs ;
     VerbsPresPrc_1 ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ V_САТОМС-a ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;
  Deverbals-kadoms ; 

LEXICON V_САТОМС-SG3
%<use_sub%>@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT1-30 ;
0000@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>%^О2т%>@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT1-30 ;
00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>Ы2@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND-PRT2-30 ;
00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:%>%^О2@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ CNJ-30 ;
%<der_cond%>%<conj%>0000@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@:%>Ы2ндеря%>@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@ CNJ-30 ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@ IND-PRS-30 ;
%<conneg%>00@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@:%>%^О2К3@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ _КУДО-Tenses1 ;
%<des%>0000@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.DES@:%>Ы2ксэ@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.DES@ DES-PRT2-30 ;
!! no deverbals

LEXICON V_ЛЕТЕМС
 V_САТОМС ;
LEXICON V_ЛЕТЕМС-SG3
 V_САТОМС-SG3 ;


LEXICON V_КАДОМС-a
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@ Indicative1 ;
%<conneg%>00@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@:%>%^О2К3@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ _КУДО-Tenses1 ;
 Desiderative-kadoms ;

 Imperative-kadoms ;
  %<opt%>@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@:0@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@ Optative-noArrow ;

LEXICON V_КУНДАМС-a
           @U.CONJ-MX.IND@         Indicative1 ;
%<conneg%>0@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@:%>К3@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ _КУДО-Tenses1 ;
 Desiderative-kundams ;
 Imperative-kundams ;
  %<opt%>@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@:0@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@ Optative-noArrow ;

LEXICON Verbs
касомс:ка IV_КАСОМС ;
муемс:му TV_ТУЕМС-ObjAll ;
саемс:сай TV_ТЕЕМС-ObjAll ;
теемс:тей TV_ТЕЕМС-ObjAll ;
туемс:ту IV_ТУЕМС ;
валгстомс:валгст V_САВТОМС  "laskea, pudottaa" ;
вешкемс:вешк IV_КАДОМС  "viheltää" ;
выжновтовомс:выжновтов IV_ЯНГАВОМС  "" ;
выркадемс:выркадь V_ЛЕДЕМС  "paiskata, viskata" ;
грубойгадомс:грубойгад V_КАДОМС  "karkeutua, raaistua" ;
гувкаемс:гувкае IV_КУНДАМС  "leimahdella, hulmahdella" ;
дивазевкшнемс:дивазевкшн IV_НЕКШНЕМС  "" ;
дёрк-теемс:дёрк-тей IV_ТЕЕМС  "" ;
жертвовамс:жертвова V_КУНДАМС  "uhrata, panna alttiiksi" ;
закусявтомс:закусявт V_САВТОМС  "kestitä, tarjota" ;
заторявомс:заторяв V_КАДОМС  "alkaa käydä, ruveta käymään (viini, olut yms.)" ;
зорнаскафтумс:зорнаскафт IV_САВТОМС  "" ;
калт-теемс:калт-тей IV_ТЕЕМС  "" ;
кандтневемс:каннев IV_САЕВЕМС  "" ;
каргодемс:каргодь IV_ЛЕДЕМС  "" ;
касомс:ка IV_КАСОМС  "kasvaa" ;
кепетемс:кепеть IV_ЛЕТЕМС  "nousta, kohota" ;
кешнявомс:кешняв IV_ЯНГАВОМС  "" ;
кивчкаекшнемс:кивчкаекшн IV_НЕКШНЕМС  "" ;
кижолдомс:кижолд IV_КАДОМС  "" ;
клукамс:клука IV_КУНДАМС  "" ;
кумболк-теемс:кумболк-тей IV_ТЕЕМС  "" ;
курвазтемс:курвазть IV_НЕВТЕМС  "" ;
ладятомс:ладят IV_САТОМС  "" ;
ластомс:ласт IV_САВТОМС  "" ;
лацевемс:лацевь V_ЛЕДЕМС  "järjestyä; tyyntyä, rauhoittua" ;
лепамкшномс:лепамкшн IV_НЕКШНЕМС_sub  "" ;
ливтетемс:ливтеть IV_ЛЕТЕМС  "peittyä näppyliin" ;
максотомс:максот IV_САТОМС  "" ;
маятомс:маят V_САТОМС  "vaivata itseään, rasittaa itseään; nähdä vaivaa" ;
мельстуемс:мельсту IV_ТУЕМС  "miellyttää" ;
молевемс:молев IV_САЕВЕМС  "" ;
основамс:основа V_КУНДАМС  "perustaa" ;
пандовомс:пандов IV_ЯНГАВОМС  "" ;
панжотомс:панжот IV_САТОМС  "" ;
педсекшнемс:педсекшн IV_НЕКШНЕМС  "" ;
пежекстэмс:пежекст IV_САВТОМС  "" ;
пежетемс:пежеть IV_НЕВТЕМС  "tehdä syntiä" ;
пекстердемс:пекстердь IV_ЛЕДЕМС  "" ;
пиемс:пи IV_МИЕМС  "kiehua" ;
пиштемс:пишть IV_НЕВТЕМС  "kärsiä puutetta" ;
порцемс:порце IV_КУНДАМС  "" ;
пошкельгадомс:пошкельгад IV_КАДОМС  "" ;
рестеемс:рестей IV_ТЕЕМС  "" ;
сайтемс:сайть IV_ЛЕТЕМС  "" ;
сееделгафтомс:сееделгафт IV_САВТОМС  "" ;
скирятомс:скирят IV_САТОМС  "" ;
стувтневемс:стувтнев IV_САЕВЕМС  "" ;
сыргоземс:сырго IV_КУЗЕМС  "herätä, сыргостемс herättää" ;
таргозтемс:таргозть IV_НЕВТЕМС  "" ;
топадемс:топадь V_ЛЕДЕМС  "polkaista, tömäyttää" ;
тощалтавтомс:тощалтавт V_САВТОМС  "näännyttää nälkään" ;
туткставомс:туткстав IV_ЯНГАВОМС  "" ;
тысмадекшнемс:тысмадекшн IV_НЕКШНЕМС  "" ;
улемс:уль IV_ЛЕДЕМС  "(pret. ульнесь) olla; tulla. мезе ули, ce ули tulkoon, mikä on tullakseen" ;
уторямс:уторя IV_КУНДАМС  "" ;
чиемс:чи IV_МИЕМС  "(pret. чийсь) juosta" ;
чикоргадомс:чикоргад IV_КАДОМС  "" ;
шилдордомс:шилдорд V_КАДОМС  "häiritä, haitata; kuljeskella ovesta edestakaisin" ;
шпиговамс:шпигова V_КУНДАМС  "silavoida" ;
эждевтевемс:эждевтев IV_САЕВЕМС  "" ;
эрьвамс:эрьва VA_КУНДАМС  "" ;
якстердемс:якстердь IV_ЛЕДЕМС  "punertua, punehtua" ;
ванстомс:ванст TV_ЧАЧТОМС-ObjAll  "vartioida, vahtia; puolustaa, varjella" ;
виемс:ви TV_МИЕМС-ObjAll  "viedä" ;
гайгстамс:гайгста TV_КУНДАМС-ObjAll  "" ;
кастнекшнемс:кастнекшн TV_НЕКШНЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
кирмицямс:кирмиця TV_КУНДАМС-ObjAll  "" ;
куземс:ку TV_КУЗЕМС-ObjAll  "kiivetä, nousta, kohota" ;
менстекшнемс:менстекшн TV_НЕКШНЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
миемс:ми TV_МИЕМС-ObjAll  "(pret. мись) myydä" ;
муемс:му TV_ТУЕМС-ObjAll  "(pret. мусь) löytää" ;
неемс:не TV_НЕЕМС-ObjAll  "nähdä" ;
нуемс:ну TV_ТУЕМС-ObjAll  "leikata (viljaa)" ;
пельдекшнемс:пельдекшн TV_НЕКШНЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
пельнемс:пельне TV_КУНДАМС-ObjAll  "rei'ittää, lävistää" ;
саемс:сай TV_ТЕЕМС-ObjAll  "(pret сайсь) ottaa; saada" ;
таргатомс:таргат TV_САТОМС-ObjAll  "kouristaa. пильгень таргатытьsuonenveto kouristaa jalkojani" ;
теемс:тей TV_ТЕЕМС-ObjAll  "tehdä, suorittaa, toimittaa; panna; muuttaa, muuntaa; rakentaa, pystyttää; luoda, perustaa, saada aikaan" ;
туемс:ту TV_ТУЕМС-ObjAll  "(pret. тусь) mennä, lähteä; käydä, sopia. тусь пиземе alkoi sataa" ;
уемс:у TV_УЕМС-ObjAll  "uida" ;
чарькодекшнемс:чарькодекшн TV_НЕКШНЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
чачтомс:чачт TV_ЧАЧТОМС-ObjAll  "synnyttää, чачтыця synnyttäjä" ;
явнокшномс:явнокшно TV_КУНДАМС-ObjAll  "" ;
